Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Public Utilities Generally
278.021.
Receivership for abandoned utility — Criteria for finding of abandonment — Consolidation of actions — Powers and duties of receiver — Temporary receivership — Commission’s discretion to approve or decline to approve applications.

If the commission, after notice and hearing, enters an order in which it finds that a utility is abandoned, the commission may bring an action in the Franklin Circuit Court for an order attaching the assets of the utility and placing those assets under the sole control and responsibility of a receiver.

For purposes of this section, a utility shall be considered abandoned if it:

Disclaims, renounces, relinquishes, or surrenders all property interests or all rights to utility property, real or personal, necessary to provide service;

Notifies the commission of its intent to abandon the operation of the facilities used to provide service;

Fails to comply with an order of the commission in which the commission determined that the utility is not rendering adequate service, specified the actions necessary for the utility to render adequate service, and fixed a reasonable time for the utility to perform such actions, and the failure of the utility to comply with the order presents a serious and imminent threat to the health or safety of a significant portion of its customers; or

Fails to meet its financial obligations to its suppliers and is unable or unwilling to take necessary actions to correct the failure after receiving reasonable notice from the commission, and the failure poses an imminent threat to the continued availability of gas, water, electric, or sewer utility service to its customers.

Within twenty (20) days after commencing an action in Franklin Circuit Court, the commission shall file a certified copy of the record of the administrative proceeding in which the commission entered its finding of abandonment.

Any action brought pursuant to KRS

278.410

for review of an order of the commission containing a finding that a utility is abandoned shall be consolidated with any action brought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and based upon the same order.

Any receiver appointed by the court shall file a bond in an amount fixed by the court. The receiver shall operate the utility to preserve its assets, to restore or maintain a reasonable level of service, and to serve the best interests of its customers.

During the pendency of any receivership, the receiver may bring or defend any cause of action on behalf of the utility and generally perform acts on behalf of the utility as the court may authorize.

The receiver shall control and manage the assets and operations of the utility until the Franklin Circuit Court, after reasonable notice and hearing, orders the receiver to return control of those assets to the utility or to liquidate those assets as provided by law.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commission may petition the Franklin Circuit Court to appoint temporarily a receiver to operate and manage the assets of an abandoned utility. After notice to the utility and a hearing, the court may grant a petition, upon terms and conditions as it deems appropriate, upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence:

That a utility has been abandoned;

That the abandonment is an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or the continued availability of service to the utility’s customers; and

That the delay required for the commission to conduct a hearing would place the public health, safety, or continued utility service at unnecessary risk.

Sixty (60) days after its entry, the order of temporary receivership shall terminate and control and responsibility for the assets and operations of the utility shall revert to the utility without further action of the court unless the commission brings an action under subsection (1) of this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as requiring the commission to approve an application made pursuant to KRS 278.020(6) for authority to abandon a utility or other assets of a utility or to cease the provision of utility service.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 145, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2011, ch. 7, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2016 ch. 50, § 2, effective April 8, 2016.

278.022.
Utility to notify commission upon receipt of notice of discontinuance or termination from supplier.

If a gas, water, electric, or sewer utility receives notice of discontinuance or termination of service from one (1) or more of its suppliers for breach or default under the terms of the service contract or tariff, and the discontinuance or termination will prevent the provision of gas, water, electric, or sewer utility service to its customers, the utility shall, within one (1) business day of receipt of the notice:

Notify the commission in writing of the supplier’s notice of discontinuance or termination; and

Furnish a copy of the supplier’s notice of discontinuance or termination to the commission.

Any gas, water, electric, or sewer utility that intends to terminate service to another utility that is subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall not terminate service without notifying the commission in writing of its intent to terminate service at least thirty (30) days prior to the date of termination.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 7, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

278.023.
Approval of federally-funded construction projects — Commission review of agreement and supporting documents — Surcharge.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any construction project undertaken by a water association, commission, district, or combined water, gas or sewer district formed under KRS Chapter 74 or 273, which is financed in whole or in part under the terms of an agreement between the water utility and the United States Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. Because federal financing of such projects entails prior review and oversight by the federal agency and obligates the utility to certain actions, and because conflicting requirements by the federal agency and the Public Service Commission may place the water utility in an untenable position and delay or jeopardize such projects, it is declared to be the policy of the Commonwealth that such agreements shall be accepted by the Public Service Commission, and that the commission shall not prohibit a water utility from fulfilling its obligations under such an agreement.

No agreement between a water utility and federal agency under this section shall take effect until thirty (30) days after such agreement, together with necessary applications and documentation, is filed with the commission, unless the commission acts within a lesser time. The commission in its administrative regulations shall list the specific documents required to be filed under this subsection.

The commission shall review the project and the agreement, may recommend changes to the utility and the federal agency, but shall not modify or reject any portion of the agreement on its own authority. The commission shall issue a certificate of necessity and convenience and such other orders as may be required to implement the terms of the agreement no later than thirty (30) days after filing.

The commission shall not prohibit the inclusion of any cost or the use of any accounting procedure in reviewing or setting the rates of the utility if such cost or procedure is required as a condition for federal financing of a construction project under an approved agreement between the water utility and federal agency.

If the federal agency approves a surcharge to the water bills of customers who receive service through an extension of water facilities under this section, which is in lieu of an assessment against the customer for the cost of the extension, then the Public Service Commission shall allow collection of the surcharge to continue for the period of years for which the surcharge was established.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 12, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 388, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

278.025.
Certificate of environmental compatibility — Requirements. [Repealed.]

278.027.
Application for certificate — Publishing notice of hearing.

When application required by KRS

278.020

is made to the commission for a certificate that public convenience and necessity require the construction of a new electric transmission line of four hundred (400) kilovolts or more, during the thirty (30) days immediately preceding the public hearing on such application provided for in KRS

278.020

(1), the commission shall, on at least four (4) days, publish notice of such hearing in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the counties and municipalities within which such transmission facility is proposed to be located in whole or in part. The commission shall not issue such a certificate for a new electric transmission line of four hundred (400) kilovolts or more unless the commission shall first determine that the proposed route of the line will reasonably minimize adverse impact on the scenic and environmental assets of the general area concerned, consistent with engineering and other technical and economic factors appropriate for consideration in determining the route of the line. At the said public hearing provided for in KRS 278.020(1), all persons residing on or owning property affected by the proposed transmission facility may be heard.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 388, § 2.

278.030.
Rates, classifications and service of utilities to be just and reasonable — Service to be adequate — Utilities prohibited from energizing power to electrical service where seal is not present.

Every utility may demand, collect and receive fair, just and reasonable rates for the services rendered or to be rendered by it to any person.

Every utility shall furnish adequate, efficient and reasonable service, and may establish reasonable rules governing the conduct of its business and the conditions under which it shall be required to render service.

Every utility may employ in the conduct of its business suitable and reasonable classifications of its service, patrons and rates. The classifications may, in any proper case, take into account the nature of the use, the quality used, the quantity used, the time when used, the purpose for which used, and any other reasonable consideration.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, no utility shall energize power to an electrical service in a manufactured home or mobile home where the certified installer’s seal is not present pursuant to KRS

227.570

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, no utility shall energize power to an electrical service in a previously owned manufactured home or previously owned mobile home where the Class B1 seal is not present pursuant to KRS

227.600

.

History.

3952-28, 3952-29: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 1, effective March 29, 1976; 2008, ch. 118, § 3, effective January 1, 2009.

278.035.
Prohibition against preferential retail rates for utility services for certain publicly-funded entities — Exception.

Any entity receiving public funds from the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any political subdivision thereof, for the purpose of offsetting at least fifty percent (50%) of its operational expenses shall not be entitled to preferential retail rates for services provided by utilities subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 278. This section shall not prohibit the provision of free or reduced rate service under KRS 278.170(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 357, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

278.040.
Public Service Commission — Jurisdiction — Regulations.

The Public Service Commission shall regulate utilities and enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commission shall be a body corporate, with power to sue and be sued in its corporate name. The commission may adopt a seal bearing the name “Public Service Commission of Kentucky,” which seal shall be affixed to all writs and official documents, and to such other instruments as the commission directs, and all courts shall take judicial note of the seal.

The jurisdiction of the commission shall extend to all utilities in this state. The commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of rates and service of utilities, but with that exception nothing in this chapter is intended to limit or restrict the police jurisdiction, contract rights or powers of cities or political subdivisions.

The commission may adopt, in keeping with KRS Chapter 13A, reasonable regulations to implement the provisions of KRS Chapter 278 and investigate the methods and practices of utilities to require them to conform to the laws of this state, and to all reasonable rules, regulations and orders of the commission not contrary to law.

History.

3952-2, 3952-12, 3952-13, 3952-27: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 2, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 8, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.

278.042.
Service adequacy and safety standards for electric utilities — National Electrical Safety Code.

For the purposes of this section, “NESC” means the National Electrical Safety Code as published by the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, Inc.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the commission shall, in enforcing service adequacy and safety standards for electric utilities, ensure that each electric utility constructs and maintains its plant and facilities in accordance with accepted engineering practices as set forth in the commission’s administrative regulations and orders and in the most recent edition of the NESC.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 84, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

278.045.
Transfer of functions of electrical inspection. [Repealed.]

278.046.
Annual reports by municipally owned electric utilities. [Repealed.]

278.047.
Rate increase for municipally owned electric utilities — Rates to be uniform. [Renumbered as KRS 96.534.]

278.050.
Membership of Public Service Commission — Appointment — Terms — Chairman — Vacancies.

The Public Service Commission shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. If the Senate is not in session when a term expires or a vacancy occurs, the Governor shall make the appointment to take effect at once, subject to the approval of the Senate when convened. Appointments to the Public Service Commission made more than ninety (90) days prior to a regular session of the General Assembly shall be subject to confirmation by the Joint Interim Committee on Energy. Each of the three (3) members of the commission shall be appointed on or before the first day of July, 1982, for staggered terms as follows: one (1) shall serve until the first day of July, 1983, one (1) until the first day of July, 1984, and one (1) until the first day of July, 1985, and thereafter for a term of four (4) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Each member of the commission shall be a full-time employee as defined in KRS 18A.005(17).

The Governor shall appoint one (1) of the commissioners on the commission to act as chairman thereof and the chairman shall be the chief executive officer of the commission. The Governor shall designate one (1) of the commissioners on the commission to serve as vice chairman thereof and act for the chairman in the latter’s absence.

Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments, but the appointee shall hold office only to the end of the unexpired term.

History.

3952-3, 3952-3a: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 91, § 1; 1972, ch. 47, § 1; 1976, ch. 88, § 3, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 11, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 2002, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 127, § 4, effective July 13, 2004.

278.060.
Qualifications of commissioners — Oath — Restrictions on conduct.

Each commissioner shall be a resident and qualified voter of this state, not less than twenty-five (25) years of age at the time of his appointment and qualification, and shall have resided in this state for at least three (3) years prior to his appointment and qualification. Each commissioner shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office, which shall be recorded in the office of the Secretary of State.

No person shall be appointed to or hold the office of commissioner who holds any official relationship to any utility, or who owns any stocks or bonds thereof, or who has any pecuniary interest therein.

No commissioner shall receive any rebate, pass, percentage of contract or other thing of value from any utility.

In addition to the restrictions on members of the commission set forth in KRS 278.050(1), no commissioner shall engage in any occupation or business inconsistent with his duties as such commissioner.

If any commissioner becomes a member of any political party committee, his office as commissioner shall be thereby vacated.

In making appointments to the commission, the Governor shall consider the various kinds of expertise relevant to utility regulation and the varied interests to be protected by the commission, including those of consumers as well as utility investors, and no more than two (2) members shall be of the same occupation or profession.

History.

3952-3, 3952-4: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 91, § 2; 1960, ch. 68, Art. XII; 1976, ch. 88, § 4, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 12, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.

278.070.
Removal of commissioners.

The Governor may remove any commissioner for cause, after giving him a copy of the charges against him and an opportunity of being publicly heard in person or by counsel in his own defense upon not less than ten (10) days’ notice. If a commissioner is removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all charges against the commissioner and his findings thereon, and a complete record of the proceedings. Any commissioner so removed may bring action in the proper court to determine whether or not he was legally removed in accordance with this section.

History.

3952-5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Power of governor to remove appointees, KRS

63.080

.

278.080.
Quorum — Performance of functions by less than a majority of commissioners or by hearing examiners.

A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any power of the commission. No vacancy in the commission shall impair the right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all of the powers of the commission. Any investigation, inquiry, or hearing that the commission has power to undertake or hold may be undertaken or held, and the evidence therein taken, by any one (1) or more commissioners or a hearing examiner designated for that purpose by the commission, and every finding, opinion or order made by the commissioner or commissioners or hearing examiner so designated shall, when approved or confirmed by the commission, become the finding, opinion or order thereof.

History.

3952-6: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 47, § 2; 1976, ch. 88, § 5, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 13, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 11, effective July 15, 1982.

278.090.
Office and hours — Meetings.

The principal office of the commission shall be located at the state capital, and it shall be kept open during the usual business hours.

The commission shall hold meetings at its principal office and at such other convenient places in the state as are expedient or necessary for the proper performance of its duties.

History.

3952-7: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 14, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 12, effective July 15, 1982.

278.100.
Executive director.

The commission shall appoint an executive director, who shall hold office during its pleasure and shall devote his entire time to the duties of his office. The executive director shall be selected on the basis of experience and training demonstrating capacity to deal with the problems of management and governmental regulation and knowledge relatable to utility regulation. The executive director shall be the chief administrative officer for the commission and shall be responsible for implementing the programs, directing the staff, and maintaining the official records of commission proceedings, including all approved orders.

History.

3952-8: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 6, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 15, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 221, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

278.110.
Additional employees.

The commission acting through the executive director may employ such clerks, stenographers, rate experts, agents, special agents, engineers, accountants, auditors, inspectors, lawyers, hearing examiners, experts and other classified service employees and the commission may contract for services of persons in a professional or scientific capacity to make or conduct a hearing or a temporary or special inquiry, investigation or examination as it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, or to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by law upon the commission.

History.

3952-10: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 7, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 16, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 14, effective July 15, 1982.

278.115.
Commission to establish internal organization of its offices.

The commission shall establish the internal organization of its offices and shall divide the commission into such offices or divisions as the commission may deem necessary to perform the functions, powers and duties of the commission, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 9, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 17, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 52, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 82, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 448, § 71, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 245, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

278.120.
Compensation and expenses of commissioners, executive director, and employees.

The chairman and the other two (2) members of the commission shall be paid a salary fixed under KRS

64.640

to be paid monthly.

The executive director of the commission shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the commission, with the approval of the Governor.

The commissioners, the executive director, and employees of the commission are entitled to all expenses, including hotel bills, incurred in traveling on business of the commission.

The salaries and expenses provided for by this section, and all other expenses of the commission incurred in the administration of this chapter, shall be paid out of appropriations as provided by law out of the general expenditure fund.

History.

3952-3, 3952-8, 3952-11, 3952-58: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 91, § 3; 1968, ch. 152, § 134; 1972, ch. 47, § 3; 1976, ch. 88, § 8, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 18, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

278.130.
Assessments against utilities — Applications for adjustment.

For the purpose of maintaining the commission, including the payment of salaries and all other expenses, and the cost of regulation of the utilities subject to its jurisdiction, the Department of Revenue shall each year assess the utilities in proportion to their earnings or receipts derived from intrastate business in Kentucky for the preceding calendar year as modified by KRS

278.150

, and shall notify each utility on or before July 1 of the amount assessed against it. The total amount so assessed shall not in any year exceed two (2) mills on intrastate receipts as so modified, which shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the general fund. The sum by each utility shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) in any one (1) year.

The assessments provided for in this section shall be in lieu of all other fees or assessments levied by any city or other political subdivision for the control or regulation of utilities.

The commission, upon application by a utility, shall authorize the utility to adjust its rates to recover, within not more than one (1) year, any change in the annual assessment and any costs imposed by commission order for the fees and expenses of consultants. The application, and any hearing or other proceedings thereon, shall be limited to the amount of such adjustment.

History.

3952-53 to 3952-55, 3952-60: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 46, § 1; 1960, ch. 206, § 1; 1964, ch. 195, § 3; 1972, ch. 47, § 4; 1976, ch. 88, § 10, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 19, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 197, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 229, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2005, ch. 85, § 671, effective June 20, 2005.

278.140.
Report of gross earnings from intrastate business.

To ascertain the amount of the assessment provided for in KRS

278.130

, each utility shall, on or before March 31 of each year, file with the commission a report of its gross earnings or receipts derived from intrastate business for the preceding calendar year.

History.

3952-55: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 20, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 18, effective July 15, 1982.

278.150.
Payment of assessments — Certification of deduction by commission — Administration of funds collected.

The commission shall, on or before June 1, certify to the Department of Revenue and the Finance and Administration Cabinet the amount of intrastate business of each utility in the state subject to its jurisdiction during the previous calendar year. The commission shall, when certifying the intrastate sales of retail electric suppliers, deduct from such sales one-half (1/2) of the applicable wholesale power costs, provided the utility from which such wholesale power purchases were made pays assessment on the full wholesale value of its gross intrastate sales in Kentucky. When certifying the intrastate sales of retail electric suppliers not subject to the jurisdiction of the commission for rates, the commission shall deduct one-half (1/2) of their actual intrastate sales. All utilities classified as retail electric suppliers shall pay assessments based on the amount of intrastate sales less deductions as certified by the commission.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, on or before June 10, establish the assessment rate and give written notification thereof to the Department of Revenue and the commission. The Department of Revenue shall collect and pay the assessment into the State Treasury to the credit of the general expenditure fund. All such assessments shall be paid into the State Treasury through the Department of Revenue on or before July 31 of the year in which the assessments are made.

If any amount in the special fund for the maintenance of the commission remains unexpended at the end of any fiscal year, that amount shall not lapse, but shall remain credited to the account of the commission and may be used during any succeeding year.

History.

3952-53, 3952-56, 3952-57: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 47, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1978, ch. 233, § 25, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 379, § 21, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 197, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2005, ch. 85, § 672, effective June 20, 2005.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In viewing the statutory history of this section, the 1978 amendment (Ch. 379, § 21) makes it abundantly clear that the original concept expressed in the original version of this section (prior to the 1972 amendment) as to the nonlapse feature of the appropriations to the commissions was to be restored, which means that: The assessments go into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund; the general fund appropriations to the commissions are calculated, in the budgetary process, to be equivalent to the total assessments collected from the regulated utilities; and any amount in the general fund appropriation to the commissions remaining unexpended at the end of any fiscal year shall not lapse, but shall remain credited to the commissions’ account and may be used by the commissions during any succeeding year.

OAG 79-481

.

Notwithstanding the general lapsing statute, former KRS

45.230

(see now KRS

45.229

), the general fund appropriations of the commissions do not lapse, since this section is an express exception to the general statute.

OAG 79-481

.

Since under 1978 state budget, the energy regulatory and utility regulatory commissions are being funded out of general fund appropriations, the designation of “special fund,” as it appears in subsection (2) of this section, has no practical implication at this stage.

OAG 79-481

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Lapsing of appropriations, KRS

45.229

.

Revolving fund accounts, KRS

45.253

.

278.160.
Utilities to file and display general schedules of rates and conditions for service — Adherence to schedules — Exclusion from disclosure of confidential or proprietary provisions in special contracts.

Under rules prescribed by the commission, each utility shall file with the commission, within such time and in such form as the commission designates, schedules showing all rates and conditions for service established by it and collected or enforced. The utility shall keep copies of its schedules open to public inspection under such rules as the commission prescribes.

No utility shall charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or less compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered than that prescribed in its filed schedules, and no person shall receive any service from any utility for a compensation greater or less than that prescribed in such schedules.

The provisions of this section do not require disclosure or publication of a provision of a special contract that contains rates and conditions of service not filed in a utility’s general schedule if such provision would otherwise be entitled to be excluded from the application of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

under the provisions of KRS 61.878(1)(c)1.

History.

3952-30, 3952-31: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 22, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 300, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 138, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

278.170.
Discrimination as to rates or service — Free or reduced rate services.

No utility shall, as to rates or service, give any unreasonable preference or advantage to any person or subject any person to any unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage, or establish or maintain any unreasonable difference between localities or between classes of service for doing a like and contemporaneous service under the same or substantially the same conditions.

Any utility may grant free or reduced rate service to its officers, agents, or employees, and may exchange free or reduced rate service with other utilities for the benefit of the officers, agents, and employees of both utilities. Any utility may grant free or reduced rate service to the United States, to charitable and eleemosynary institutions, and to persons engaged in charitable and eleemosynary work, and may grant free or reduced rate service for the purpose of providing relief in case of flood, epidemic, pestilence, or other calamity. The terms “officers” and “employees,” as used in this subsection, include furloughed, pensioned, and superannuated officers and employees, and persons who have become disabled or infirm in the service of the utility. Notice must be given to the commission and its agreement obtained for such reduced rate service except in case of an emergency, in which case the commission shall be notified at least five (5) days after the service is rendered.

Upon obtaining commission approval of a tariff setting forth terms and conditions of service the commission deems necessary, a utility as defined in KRS 278.010(3)(d) may grant free or reduced rate service for the purpose of fighting fires or training firefighters to any city, county, urban-county, charter county, fire protection district, or volunteer fire protection district. Any tariff under this section shall require the water user to maintain estimates of the amount of water used for fire protection and training, and to report this water usage to the utility on a regular basis.

The commission may determine any question of fact arising under this section.

History.

3952-32: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 11, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 23, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

278.172.
Rate classification for certain entities.

Every utility which serves a volunteer fire department or other entity eligible for aid under KRS

95A.262

, shall supply such service at the lowest rate available under its tariffs to customers with comparable consumption amounts, including residential or farm rates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 149, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 381, § 11, effective July 14, 1992.

278.180.
Changes in rates, how made.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no change shall be made by any utility in any rate except upon thirty (30) days’ notice to the commission, stating plainly the changes proposed to be made and the time when the changed rates will go into effect. However, the commission may, in its discretion, based upon a showing of good cause in any case, shorten the notice period from thirty (30) days to a period of not less than twenty (20) days. The commission may order a rate change only after giving an identical notice to the utility. The commission may order the utility to give notice of its proposed rate increase to that utility’s customers in the manner set forth in its regulations.

The commission, upon application of any utility, may prescribe a less time within which a reduction of rates may be made.

History.

3952-15: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 88, § 12, effective March 29, 1976; 1978, ch. 379, § 24, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 242, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 300, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

278.183.
Surcharge to recover costs of compliance with environmental requirements for coal combustion wastes and by-products — Environmental compliance plan, review and adjustment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, effective January 1, 1993, a utility shall be entitled to the current recovery of its costs of complying with the Federal Clean Air Act as amended and those federal, state, or local environmental requirements which apply to coal combustion wastes and by-products from facilities utilized for production of energy from coal in accordance with the utility’s compliance plan as designated in subsection (2) of this section. These costs shall include a reasonable return on construction and other capital expenditures and reasonable operating expenses for any plant, equipment, property, facility, or other action to be used to comply with applicable environmental requirements set forth in this section. Operating expenses include all costs of operating and maintaining environmental facilities, income taxes, property taxes, other applicable taxes, and depreciation expenses as these expenses relate to compliance with the environmental requirements set forth in this section.

Recovery of costs pursuant to subsection (1) of this section that are not already included in existing rates shall be by environmental surcharge to existing rates imposed as a positive or negative adjustment to customer bills in the second month following the month in which costs are incurred. Each utility, before initially imposing an environmental surcharge pursuant to this subsection, shall thirty (30) days in advance file a notice of intent to file said plan and subsequently submit to the commission a plan, including any application required by KRS 278.020(1), for complying with the applicable environmental requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The plan shall include the utility’s testimony concerning a reasonable return on compliance-related capital expenditures and a tariff addition containing the terms and conditions of a proposed surcharge as applied to individual rate classes. Within six (6) months of submittal, the commission shall conduct a hearing upon the request of a party, and shall, regardless of whether or not a hearing is requested:

Consider and approve the plan and rate surcharge if the commission finds the plan and rate surcharge reasonable and cost-effective for compliance with the applicable environmental requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section;

Establish a reasonable return on compliance-related capital expenditures; and

Approve the application of the surcharge.

The amount of the monthly environmental surcharge shall be filed with the commission ten (10) days before it is scheduled to go into effect, along with supporting data to justify the amount of the surcharge which shall include data and information as may be required by the commission. At six (6) month intervals, the commission shall review past operations of the environmental surcharge of each utility, and after hearing, as ordered, shall, by temporary adjustment in the surcharge, disallow any surcharge amounts found not just and reasonable and reconcile past surcharges with actual costs recoverable pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Every two (2) years the commission shall review and evaluate past operation of the surcharge, and after hearing, as ordered, shall disallow improper expenses, and to the extent appropriate, incorporate surcharge amounts found just and reasonable into the existing base rates of each utility.

The commission may employ competent, qualified independent consultants to assist the commission in its review of the utility’s plan of compliance as specified in subsection (2) of this section. The cost of any consultant shall be included in the surcharge approved by the commission.

The commission shall retain all jurisdiction granted by this section and KRS

278.020

to review the environmental surcharge authorized by this section and any complaints as to the amount of any environmental surcharge or the incorporation of any environmental surcharge into the existing base rate of any utility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2019 ch. 66, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

278.185.
Notification to customers of proposed rate change by sewerage corporations. [Repealed].